parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/ENGLISH/FST/src/lex-events.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	 Names of Events, Laws, etc.
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	 ENGLISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:	 A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	 12-Apr-2006
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	 xfst  -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l rules.xfst
!# ============================================================================
!#
!# SOURCES: 
!# [0]: old analyser (cf. old-roots.txt)
!# [1]: file event-law.xfst
!# [2]: file additions.xfst
!#
!# [w1]: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bank_holidays#Current_Bank_Holidays
!# [w2]: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Category:Holidays_of_the_United_States
!# [w3]: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Holidays_in_Canada
!# [w4]; http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jewish_Holidays
!#
!# - http://en.wikipedia.org
!# - http://www.websters-online-dictionary.org/
!# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Multichar_Symbols
+Prop		! proper name

+PostMod	! post-modifier [not used]
+PreMod		! pre-modifier	[not used]
+Head		! head word  	(e.g. "Festival")

+Event		!
+Law		! 

+Abbr		! abbreviation
+Acron		! acronym


! for internal use:
^MAN		! for irregular plura -man -> -men
^AND		! " and " or "&"
^DOT		! optional period at end of abbreviation
^PlE		! plural ending with -e-

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! tag combinations:
!	+Prop +Event		[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Abbr)
!	+Prop +Event +Head	[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen)
!	+Prop +Law		[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Abbr)
!	+Prop +Law +Head	[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen)
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------



!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON ROOT

! word parts
Act+Law						HEAD;		!#	[1]
Agreement+Law					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Assembly+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Award+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Battle+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Biennale+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Championship+Event				HEAD;		!#	[1]
Conference+Event				HEAD;		!#	[1]
Congress+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Conquest+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Constitution+Law				HEAD;		!#	[1]
Cup+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Edict+Law					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Election+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Feast+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Festival+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Game+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Law+Law						HEAD;		!#	[1]
Marathon+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
March+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Meeting+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Open+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Pact+Law					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Parade+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Revolution+Event				HEAD;		!#	[1]
Tournament+Event				HEAD;		!#	[1]
Treaty+Law					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Trophy+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
War+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]
Workshop+Event					HEAD;		!#	[1]

! full names
Academy% Award+Event				PROP;		!	[2]
Alaska% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
All% Saints'% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!	[0]
All% Souls'% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!	[0]
Americanization% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Arbor% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Aseret% Yemei% Teshuva+Event			PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Ash% Wednesday+Event				PROP/SG;		!	[0]
Battle% of% the% Boyne+Event			PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Boxing% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Canada% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# CA	[w3]
Candelmas+Event					PROP/SG;	!	[0]
Carnation% Revolution+Event			PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Casimir% Pulaski% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Chanukah+Event					PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Christmas% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Citizenship% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Columbus% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Confederate% Memorial% Day+Event		PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Constitution% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Day% of% Atonement+Event			PROP/SG;	!	[0]
Defenders% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Discoverer's% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Doomsday% Book+Law				PROP/SG;	!	[2]
Early% May% Bank% Holiday+Event			PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Easter% Monday%+Event				PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Easter% Sunday%+Event				PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Easter+Event					PROP/SG;	!	[0]
Education% and% Sharing% Day+Event		PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Father's% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Flag% Day+Event					PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Franksgiving+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
General% Pulaski% Memorial% Day+Event		PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
German-American% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Glorious% Revolution+Event			PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Good% Friday+Event				PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Grand% Prix+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Great% Proletarian% Cultural% Revolution+Event	PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Groundhog% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Hanukah+Event					PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Hanukkah+Event					PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Hogmanay+Event					PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Human% Rights+Law				PROP/PL;
Inauguration% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Independence% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[0][w2]
Juneteenth+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Kamehameha% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Labor% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[0][w2]
Lag% Ba'omer+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Leif% Erikson% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Lincoln's% Birthday+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Loyalty% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Mardi% Gras+Event				PROP/SG;	!	[0]
Martin% Luther% King% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Maryland% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Maundy% Thursday+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[0]
May% Day% Bank% Holiday+Event			PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
May% Day+Event					PROP/SG;	!	[0]
Memorial% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[0][w2]
Mother's% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
National% Aviation% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
National% Catfish% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
National% Day% of% Mourning+Event		PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
New% Year's% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Orangeman's% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Orangemen's% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Palm% Sunday+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[0]
Passover+Event					PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Patriot% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Patriot's% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Pesach+Event					PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Pioneer% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Powder% House% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Presidents'% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Purim+Event					PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Remembrance% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# CA	[w3]
Republican% Revolution+Event			PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Rosh% Chodesh+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Rosh% Hashanah+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Saint% Patrick's% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Sefirah+Event					PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Seward's% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Shavuot+Event					PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Shemini% Atzeret+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Simchat% Torah+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Spring% Bank% Holiday+Event			PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
St% Patrick's% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
St% Stephen's% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Stillbirth% Remembrance% Day+Event		PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Sukkot+Event					PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Summer% Bank% Holiday+Event			PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Sweetest% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Tartan% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Thanksgiving+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Tisha% B'av+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Tithe% of% animals+Event			PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Tour% de% France+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Tu% Bishvat+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Turducken% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Velvet% Revolution+Event			PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Veterans% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[0][w2]
Victoria% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# CA	[w3]
Von% Steuben% Day+Event				PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Washington's% Birthda+Event			PROP;		!	[0]
Whit% Monday+Event				PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Whit% Sunday+Event				PROP/SG;	!# GB	[w1]
Whitsunday+Event				PROP;		!	[0]
Word% War% I+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Word% War% I+Event+Abbr:WWI			PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Word% War% II+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Word% War% II+Event+Abbr:WWII			PROP/SG;	!#	[1]
Wright% Brothers% Day+Event			PROP/SG;	!# US	[w2]
Yom% Ha'Shoah+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Yom% Ha'atzma'ut+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Yom% Hazikaron+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Yom% Kippur+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]
Yom% Yerushalayim+Event				PROP/SG;	!#	[w4]


!# ============================================================================
!# CONTINUATION CLASSES
!# ============================================================================

LEXICON GENSG		< %^GenSg >		#;
LEXICON GENPL		< %^GenPl >		#;

LEXICON optGENSG	#; GENSG;
LEXICON optGENPL	#; GENPL;

LEXICON N/SG		< %+Sg:0 >		optGENSG;
LEXICON N/PL		< %+Pl:0 >		optGENPL;
LEXICON N/SG+PLs				N/SG; 
			< 0:{+s} >		N/PL;


LEXICON PROP/SG		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON PROP/PL		< %+Prop:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON PROP		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!#  name modifiers
!LEXICON PREMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PreMod:0 >		#;
!LEXICON POSTMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PostMod:0 >	#;

!LEXICON HEAD/SG		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG;
!LEXICON HEAD/PL		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON HEAD		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG+PLs;
